Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB770.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly hereby establishes the Promise Program to assist
individuals to become certified Kentucky teachers and render teaching service in
Kentucky schools.
(2) For purposes of this section, the terms listed below shall have the following
meanings:
(a) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(b) "Eligible program of study" means an undergraduate or graduate program
of study which is preparatory to teacher certification;
(c) "Eligible student" means a student who:
1. Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
2. Is a Kentucky resident, as determined by the participating institution
in accordance with criteria established by the Council on
Postsecondary Education for the purposes of admission and tuition
assessment;
3. Is enrolled at a participating institution;
4. Scored in the top twenty-five percent (25%) of all Kentucky students
on the college admissions examination administered in the spring of
grade eleven (11) as required by KRS 158.6453; and
5. Meets any other criteria established in administrative regulation
promulgated by the authority;
(d) "Participating institution" means an institution of higher education located
in Kentucky which offers an eligible program of study and has in force an
agreement with the authority providing for administration of this program;
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/25/2026 7:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 342
and
(e) "Qualified teaching service" means teaching the major portion of each
school day for at least eighty (80) days each semester in a public school of
the Commonwealth while satisfying a one (1) year contract, except that an
individual having a disability as defined in Title II of the Americans with
Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 12131 et seq., or serious and extended
illness, whose disability or illness, certified by a licensed physician, prevents
that individual from teaching a major portion of each school day, shall be
deemed to perform qualified teaching service by teaching the maximum
time permitted by their attending physician.
(3) The authority may, to the extent of appropriations and other funds available to it
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, award promise awards to eligible
students pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, who initially demonstrate
financial need in accordance with standards and criteria established by the
authority. Each promise award shall be evidenced by a promissory note that
requires repayment or cancellation pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.
(4) Promise awards shall be provided to eligible students accepted into an eligible
program of study. To the extent funds are available, the authority shall provide
eligible students a maximum award of up to the highest tuition charged by a
Kentucky public university for full-time enrollment in an undergraduate
program, not to exceed the applicant's total cost of attendance minus other
financial assistance received or expected to be received by the applicant during
the academic period.
(5) (a) The authority shall disburse promise awards to eligible students who agree
to render qualified teaching service as certified teachers and are
unconditionally admitted and enrolled in an eligible program of study.
(b) A promise award shall not be provided or a promissory note cancellation
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/25/2026 7:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 342
shall not be granted to any person who is in default on any obligation to the
authority under any program administered by the authority pursuant to
KRS 164.740 to 164.7870 until financial obligations to the authority are
satisfied, except that ineligibility for this reason may be waived by the
authority for cause.
(c) Recipients shall render five (5) years of qualified teaching service with no
accrual of interest or payment due on the amount of promise awards. At the
completion of each year of qualified teaching service, twenty percent (20%)
of the initial promise award shall be cancelled.
(d) If the recipient of a promise award fails to complete an eligible program of
study at a participating institution or fails to render qualified teaching
service, unless the failure is temporarily waived for cause by the authority,
the recipient shall immediately become liable to the authority for repayment
of the sum of all outstanding promissory notes and interest accrued.
Persons liable for repayment of awards under this paragraph shall be liable
for interest accruing from the date on which the recipient ceases to be
enrolled in an eligible program of study and ceases qualified teaching
service.
(e) The authority shall establish, by administrative regulation, the terms and
conditions for the award, cancellation, and repayment of promise
scholarships, including but not limited to the selection criteria, eligibility for
renewal awards, amount of scholarship payments, deferments, the rate of
repayment, and the interest rate thereon.
(f) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, the maximum interest
rate applicable to repayment of a promissory note under this section shall be
eight percent (8%) per annum, except that if a judgment is rendered to
recover payment, the judgment shall bear interest at the rate of five percent
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/25/2026 7:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 342
(5%) greater than the rate actually charged on the promissory note.
(6) A repayment obligation imposed by this section shall not be voidable by reason of
the age of the recipient at the time of receiving the promise award.
(7) Failure to meet repayment obligations imposed by this section shall be cause for
the revocation of a person's teaching certificate, subject to the procedures set
forth in KRS 161.120.
(8) All moneys repaid to the authority under this section shall be added to the
appropriations made for purposes of this section, and the funds and unobligated
appropriations shall not lapse.
(9) The authority may execute appropriate contracts and promissory notes for
administering this section.
(10) (a) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, if available funds are
insufficient for all requested awards for eligible students during any fiscal
year, the authority shall give priority consideration to eligible students who
previously received promise awards. If funds are insufficient to make all
requested renewal awards to eligible students, the authority shall reduce all
awards to the extent necessary to provide awards to all qualified renewal
students.
(b) If after awarding to all eligible renewal students, funds are not depleted,
initial eligible students shall be ranked according to regulatory selection
criteria, which may include application date, and awards shall be made to
eligible students until funds are depleted.
(11) The authority shall submit a report on the number of promise awards provided in
each fiscal year, the program of study in which recipients are enrolled, recipient
retention rates, total number of applications, and scholarship recruitment
strategies to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim
Joint Committee on Postsecondary Education by December 1 of each year.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/25/2026 7:10 PM Jacketed